Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1909
Failure to cooperate; effect.

Failure to cooperate with an investigation by the office may result in public disclosure of the failure to cooperate.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-909;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 53.